North Carolina, session 2025, SB935.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 7A-133(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) Each county shall have the numbers of magistrates and additional seats of district
court, as set forth in the following table:
Magistrates Additional
County Min. Seats of Court
…
Mecklenburg 38.543.5
…."
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Administrative
Office of the Courts the sum of two hundred thirty-six thousand one hundred forty dollars
($236,140) in recurring funds beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to hire five
additional magistrates to serve in Mecklenburg County pursuant to Section 1 of this act.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*S935-v-1*